Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.190

Canvassing signatures—Time of—Notice.

Upon the filing of a recall petition, the officer with whom the charge was filed shall stamp on each petition the date of filing, and shall notify the persons filing them and the officer whose recall is demanded of the date when the petitions will be canvassed, which date must be not less than five or more than ten days from the date of its filing.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1415; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.080. Prior: 1913 c 146 s 9, part; RRS s 5358, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.080.]